Hawaii, session 2026, GM1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State faces
significant challenges in providing timely and equitable child
custody evaluations for families engaged in family court
proceedings. Existing law authorizes certain mental health
professionals with master's degree-level training to serve as
child custody evaluators but does not extend this opportunity to
licensed mental health counselors. Licensed mental health
counselors possess equivalent graduate-level education,
training, and clinical expertise as their peers who are already
eligible to serve as child custody evaluators.
The legislature further finds that there is a high demand
for child custody evaluations across the State, resulting in
backlogs and extended wait times that delay critical decisions
impacting children's health, safety, and well-being. The
State's limited pool of qualified child custody evaluators
exacerbates these delays, as courts frequently struggle to
2026-2062 HB1705 SD2 SMA.docx
HilillllMlllimiHII

Page 2
H.B. NO. ^0^
secure professionals who are available to take on new cases
promptly.
The legislature recognizes that child custody evaluations
are highly complex and require specialized mental health
training, clinical experience, and the ability to conduct
thorough investigations and provide accurate, unbiased reports
to the court. Licensed mental health counselors meet these
professional standards and are well-equipped to provide these
evaluations.
The legislature additionally finds that the State faces a
severe shortage of mental health professionals overall. By
excluding licensed mental health counselors from serving as
child custody evaluators, existing law unnecessarily restricts a
significant portion of the State's qualified workforce from
contributing to this critical area of need. This artificial
limitation on supply has also driven up the costs of child
custody evaluations, making them prohibitively expensive for
many families. These high costs can perpetuate inequities in
family court proceedings, including situations where one parent
may be unable to afford an evaluation, thereby placing them at a
2026-2062 HB1705 SD2 SMA.docx 2
iniBiiiiHHiimiiiiBii

Page 3
H.B. NO.
disadvantage and potentially enabling patterns of financial or
coercive abuse.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to allow licensed
mental health counselors to be appointed as child custody
evaluators in the State, thereby expanding the pool of qualified
professionals, reducing costs, alleviating delays, and ensuring
families have greater access to timely and equitable child
custody determinations.
SECTION 2. Section 571-46.4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Subject to subsection (c), a person may be appointed
as a child custody evaluator for purposes of section 571-46 if
the person is actively licensed as a:
(1) Marriage and family therapist under chapter 451J;
(2) Physician under chapter 453 and is a board certified
psychiatrist or has completed a residency in
psychiatry;
(3) Mental health counselor under chapter 453D;
[-<3-)-] (4) Psychologist under chapter 465; or
(5) Clinical social worker under section
467E-7 (a) (3) . "
2026-2062 HB1705 SD2 SMA.docx 3

Page 4 H.B. NO. ""
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2062 HB1705 SD2 SMA.docx
iiiiMiinniiiiiMiiiiiHiiiM

H.B. NO.
I I ’I
APPROVED this 10th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1705, HD 1,SD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B.No. 1705, H.D. 1,S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3763